Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2804
Physician, defined.

Physician shall mean a person with an unlimited license to practice medicine in this state pursuant to the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act or a person with a license to practice osteopathic medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state pursuant to sections 38-2029 to 38-2033.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1136.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.